Florida, session 2026, HB1081.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsection (4) is added to section 1004.444,
Florida Statutes, to read:
1004.444 Florida Center for Cybersecurity.—
(4) Subject to appropriation, the center shall assist in
the expansion of experiential learning opportunities for
students at state universities, Florida College System
institutions, and private postsecondary educational institutions
by:
(a) Developing a Cybersecurity Experiential Learning
Program. The center shall:
1. Identify specific internship and experiential learning
opportunities that the United States Department of Commerce's
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1081 -03-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/CS/HB 1081 2026 Legislature
National Institute of Standards and Technology (NIST) has
identified as the most impactful on a student's job placement in
high-demand cybersecurity roles.
2. Consult with employers in this state with openings or
anticipated openings in cybersecurity roles or other industries
that perform work that require a security clearance.
3. Review best practices for cybersecurity experiential
learning opportunities in place at other National Security
Agency National Centers of Academic Excellence in Cybersecurity-
designated institutions within and outside of the state that can
be replicated at institutions across the state, including those
that NIST has identified as the most impactful on a student's
job placement in high-demand cybersecurity roles.
4. Establish the minimum qualifications that a student
should possess or meet before enrolling in the Cybersecurity
Experiential Learning Program.
5. Identify the state universities, Florida College System
institutions, and private postsecondary educational institutions
seeking to participate in the program and the projected number
of students to be served at each participating institution
during the fiscal year.
(b) Publishing on its website, by July 1, 2028, and on
July 1 of each year thereafter, a report on the Cybersecurity
Experiential Program that contains, by institution, the number
of students participating in the program, the number of program
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1081 -03-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/CS/HB 1081 2026 Legislature
completers, the passage rate of any certification examinations,
the placement rate of program completers in cybersecurity
positions, and recommendations for program improvements,
including potential integration with other state workforce
initiatives.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1081 -03-er